District of Columbia statutes.
25-202

Establishment of the Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Administration.

There is established an Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Administration (“ABRA”) as an independent agency of the District to provide professional, technical, and administrative staff assistance to the Board in the performance of its functions. ABRA shall carry out its functions under the supervision of the Board.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
This section is referenced in § 25-101.